Tennessee, session 114, SB0095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (49).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee historical commission, created by § 4-11-102;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0095
000354
- 1 -